Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1172.
do enact as follows:AB1172,15Section 1. 20.855 (4) (eg) of the statutes is created to read:AB1172,2,6120.855 (4) (eg) Transfer to conservation fund; resident senior citizen annual 2fishing license fee reimbursement. A sum sufficient for transfer to the conservation 3fund in an amount equal to the amount to be paid into the conservation fund as 4determined under s. 25.29 (1) (g). The amounts may be paid at such intervals 5during each fiscal year as the secretary of administration deems appropriate or 6necessary.AB1172,27Section 2. 25.29 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:AB1172,2,10825.29 (1) (g) Each fiscal year, an amount equal to the number of annual 9fishing licenses issued to resident senior citizens under ch. 29 in that fiscal year 10multiplied by $7.AB1172,311Section 3. 29.563 (3) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1172,2,121229.563 (3) (a) 2. Annual fishing issued to a resident senior citizen: $6.25 $0.AB1172,413Section 4. 29.563 (6m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1172,2,181429.563 (6m) (a) The fee for an approval that is listed under sub. (2) (a) 1., 2., 4. 15to 5g., 8., 8m., or 9., (3) (a) 1., 2., or 4., or (6) (a) 1. is $4.25 if the approval is issued 16to a person who has not received that type of approval, or has not been conferred the 17privileges of that type of approval under a license issued under s. 29.231 or 29.235, 18in any of the 10 years preceding the date of application.AB1172,519Section 5. 29.563 (14) (c) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1172,2,212029.563 (14) (c) 7. There is no issuing fee for an annual disabled veteran 21recreation card or an annual fishing license issued to a resident senior citizen.AB1172,2,2222